guesser/guess.nouns.lexicon.lexd
#-----------NOUNS-----------

LEXICON NounAbsSgLex
ригьи       # время
адам
иса
бисси       # unk
петер
якъуб
алкуци
анга
анжи
анжиди
анлъи
анччу
арком
ахъи
ахъу
баба
бакІволуласси
баквол
бара
баркІвол
бархон
бежун
бекьи
бел
белим
белир
берча
бесун
беху
бехун
беххиркъил
беххумгъул
беча
бешон
бикІун
бил
билъо
биччин
бишонни
бокьи
борцІцІи
боцІо
бочичи
боши
бугъа
бугьу
бура
буртина
бурчІина
бутІа
вацал
воцци
вошо
вошув-вошо
вошуй-йоши
гага
газа
гама
гару
гвай
гвала
гворзу
геду
гежи
гиргин
гудур
гужи
гумуги
гун
гъадор
гъажу
гъайчІа
гъалай
гъан
гъанни
гъацІа
гъвагъвачи
гъвамарссу
гъобгъо
гъугъу
гъузи
гъун
гьабу
гьакъу
гьамкІво
гьамку
гьаморохи
гьантІикІа
гьаркІу
гьаркьу
гьатІи
гьекІа
гьекІва
гьекьим
гьикьим
гьилму
гьиму
гьин
гьинкІкІу
гьинкІкІур
гьинцІо
гьинцІцІу
гьир
гьиро
гьиᵸгьиᵸ
гьокьийа
гьокьу
гьоли
гьон
гьонно
гьонноххир
гьону
гьорчІин
гьорчІичол
гьорчІчІи
гьума
гьунцІцІи
гьунчІа
дада
дазу
дан
даркъгва
джинджи
дум
дунгил
жала
жинна
жуна
за
зар
зиву
зубу
игьа
игьур
ила
илъоб
има
ингура
инква
инккуб
инккул
инцци
инцциртІа
инчи
ирса
исиб
исир
исо
ихвоб
ича
ишкІол
ишу
йавлухъи
йал
йацъал
йоцци
йоши
йошкІа
йошква
йошулІи-вошо
йошулІи-йоши
кІази
кІакІу
кІамур
кІатІара
кІекІе
кІикІим
кІинкІи
кІкІара
кІкІвой
кІкІонччу
кІкІуну
кІол
кІонкьа
кІонча
кІоркІон
кІоту
кІунцІцІи
кІуркІул
кІурцІцІо
караки
кванно
квачІа
кво
квол
кволъир
квордо
кворкъин
квоцІи
кечІи
кини
кицІу
ккуб
ккуба
ккула
кока
кору
кощи
кули
кун
кунтІа
куренжи
курки
куртІа
къали
къаму
къаркъала
къатІипа
къванкъва
къгантІа
къгасдо
къгвакъгвал
къгвон
къгенкъге
къгерцІцІи
къгурцІим
къгурчи
къеб
къен
къиннил
къиннилаххуб
къир
къуйло
къуну
къурру
кьанкІала
кьанхил
кье
кьеркьил
кьерчІо
кьетон
кьехва
кьибдил
кьиму
кьиру
кьуна
кьури
кьучІчІи
лІарлІал
лІурлІа
лабила
лабур
лага
лала
лел
ленссиб
леншур
лерчол
линни
лом
лохво
лъаблъал
лъанцІцІи
лъахиб
лъедир
лъенцІцІу
лъин
лъиру
лълъен
лълъенссо
лъол
лъочІчІу
лъуди
лъумур
магьар
матІу
мачу
меди
мигажу
мигва
мигъерчІу
мигъул
мижа
мийар
микъгвор
микъи
милдар
милки
милча
милъи
милъийол
миргъара
миса
мисиди
мисхъара
михи
михъи
мицІцІи
мичІи
мичІи-гьекьим
мокІво
мокъго
мокъол
мокьи
мочІи
мочи
мукъга
мулъа
муха
ниду
никво
никку
ниха
ничІу
ничо
нокво
ноцІцІи
нуса
нусо
нусхъвор
онжи
онххур
онщи
орси
ошхъоги
падан
падучан
паларси
пера
пинжав
пирцІцІи
пол
пурхул
рагьал
ражи
ракъгвара
раххасси
реблІа
ребццу
регъил
рекІул
рекун
рела
рели
релилІи
релъо
релъоба
реси
реххин
реша
решин
рижи
рикъгрикъгил
рикьи
риххир
ричІин
рокІво
рокьи
рокьочул
рола
рохъи
рочІчІи
рошан
рошо
ругъун
рукьо
ручол
салисол
саркьу
сейи
сикъги
сим
ситІа
сол
сор
соси
ссагьи
ссакур
ссекІу
ссим
ссунтІул
сур
сусукІу
тІамсса
тІана
тІебтІел
тІентІа
тІонкІил
тІука
тІуши
тай
талирси
тибар
токІщи
томил
томшил
тото
тускІар
унсо
уххи
уᵸъецу
хвами
хво
хвой
хволо
ххвото
херзим
хороша
хубхул
хунссир
хур
хурши
хуцІу
хуца
ххелчаму
ххин
ххубару
хъаба
хъал
хъандиру
хъанжар
хъапача
хъачиргъа
хъволо
хъиру
хъота
хъухъадир
цІа
цІиву
цІил
цІул
цІумур
цІцІа
цІцІакара
цІцІана
цІцІе
цІцІекІа
цІцІекІа-лъол
цІцІекІир
цІцІер
цІцІерти
цІцІийа
цІцІиком
цІцІикъу
цІцІиру
цІцІон
цІцІуку
цІцІума
цІцІун
цІцІунно
цел
ццинаъал
ццула
чІабхи
чІами
чІамчІал
чІаха
чІаъа
чІичІил
чІичІом
чІол
чІому
чІонни
чІор
чІора
чІорбутІи
чІуйриги
чІчІартил
чІчІингъа
чакмагьи
чанагъи
чил
чингил-чонгол
чор
чорди-гъанни
чуги
чукІа
чухтІу
шекъе
шен
шинкІи
щекІи
щекиб
щиб
щиву
